Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska10-1206
Act; construction with other law
or home rule charters.

The
Nebraska Governmental Unit Credit Facility Act shall be independent of and
in addition to any other provision of law of the State of Nebraska or provisions
of home rule charters, and any credit facility may be obtained under the act
for any purpose authorized in the act even though other laws of the State
of Nebraska or provisions of home rule charters may provide for the obtaining
of a credit facility for the same or similar purposes. The act shall not be
considered amendatory of or limited by any other law of the State of Nebraska
or provisions of home rule charters, and any credit facility may be obtained
under the act without complying with the restrictions or requirements of any
other law of the State of Nebraska, except when specifically required by the
act, or without complying with the restrictions or requirements of home rule
charters. Nothing in the act shall prohibit or limit the obtaining of any
credit facility in accordance with other applicable laws of the State of Nebraska
or of home rule charters, if the governing body of a governmental unit determines
to obtain such credit facility under such other laws or charter or otherwise
limit the provisions of any home rule charter.

Laws 2009, LB377, § 6.